Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1237
Personal Property Tax Relief Act; act, how cited.

Sections 77-1237 to 77-1239 shall be known and may be cited as the Personal Property Tax Relief Act.

Laws 2015, LB259, § 1.